Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.2582

Service agent—Registration certificate—Renewal—Competency examination—Fee—Decision—Denial—Notice—Refund.

(1) Each request for a renewal or new official registration certificate must be in writing and on a form prescribed by the department and must contain any relevant information as the director may require, including but not limited to the following:

(a) The name and address of the person, corporation, partnership, or sole proprietorship requesting registration;

(b) The names and addresses of all persons requesting an official registration certificate from the department; and

(c) The tax registration number as required under RCW 82.32.030 or unified business identifier provided on a business license issued under RCW 19.02.070.

(2) The department may require persons registering as service agents to attain a satisfactory score on competency examinations administered or approved for use by the department. The director may adopt rules for administering and conducting the examination, including adoption of any examination fees necessary to cover the costs for preparing for and administering the examination. Examination fees are in addition to the application fee under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) Each person submitting a new or renewal application for an official registration certificate must pay a fee to the department in the amount of one hundred eighty dollars per person per year for the duration of the certificate.

(4) Renewal applicants filing after a certification expiration date must pay an additional fee equal to twenty percent of the renewal fee unless the applicant submits a declaration or affidavit stating that the applicant has not acted as a service agent following the expiration of the certification.

(5) Persons submitting new or renewal applications for an official registration certificate must have sufficient equipment available to adequately test devices and a means of identifying work the applicant has performed on weighing and measuring devices. The director may adopt rules for these requirements.

(6) The department must issue a decision within twenty days of receipt of a new or renewal application. If denying an application, the department must state the reasons for the denial in a written notice to the applicant.

[ 2019 c 96 s 8; 2013 c 144 s 35; 2006 c 358 s 5; 1995 c 355 s 16. Formerly RCW 19.94.025.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Effective dates—2006 c 358: See note following RCW 19.94.175.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.